Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1310
Recall election; failure or refusal to call; county attorney; duties.

If the governing board of a political subdivision fails or refuses to call for a recall election by the date established in subsection (2) of section 32-1306, the county attorney in the county in which the board is located shall file an action in the district court to order the recall election. For offices filled by election in more than one county, the county attorney in the county with the most registered voters residing within the political subdivision shall file the action in the district court to order the recall election.

Laws 2022, LB843, § 46.